Washington statutes.
RCW 15.70.010

Director may receive federal funds for rural rehabilitation corporation.

The director of the state department of agriculture is hereby designated as the state official of the state of Washington to make application to and receive from the secretary of agriculture of the United States, or any other proper federal official, pursuant and subject to the provisions of public law 499, 81st congress, approved May 3, 1950, the trust assets, either funds or property, held by the United States as trustee in behalf of the Washington rural rehabilitation corporation.

[ 1961 c 11 s 15.70.010. Prior: 1951 c 169 s 1.]